Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5408
Credits; how used.

(1) The credits prescribed in section 77-5407 shall be established by filing the forms required by the Tax Commissioner with the income tax return for the year. The credits may be used after any other nonrefundable credits to reduce the taxpayer's income tax liability imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967.

(2) The credits may be used as allowed in subsection (1) of this section and shall be applied in the order in which they were first allowed. Any decision on how part of the credit is applied shall not limit how the remaining credit could be applied under this section.

(3) The credits may be carried over until fully used, except that credits may not be carried over more than three years after the end of the entitlement period.

Laws 2000, LB 936, § 8.

Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, see section 77-2701.